Wyoming, session 2025, HB0133.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-25-101 and 9-25-102 are created to
read:
CHAPTER 25
PROHIBITION ON IMMIGRATION SANCTUARIES
9-25-101. Definitions.
(a) As used in this chapter:
(i) "Executive order" means a directive, order,
policy or proclamation that manages the operation of the
state government issued by the governor;
(ii) "Federal officials" or "federal law
enforcement officers" means any person employed by the
United States government or any agency or department
thereof for the primary purpose of enforcing or regulating
federal immigration laws and any peace officer as defined
in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv) when the person or peace officer is
acting within the scope of employment to enforce federal
immigration laws;
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0133
ENROLLED ACT NO. 76, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iii) "Immigration status" means the legality or
illegality of a person's presence in the United States as
determined by federal law;
(iv) "Immigration status information" means any
information that is not confidential or privileged by law
including any statement, document, computer generated data,
recording or photograph that is relevant to immigration
status or the identity or location of a person who is
reasonably believed to be illegally residing within the
United States or involved in international terrorism or
domestic terrorism as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2331;
(v) "State or Local official or employee" means
any elected or appointed official, supervisor or managerial
employee or peace officer, contractor or agent acting on
behalf of or in conjunction with the state or a city, town
or county;
(vi) "Policy" means any regulation, rule,
ordinance, policy or practice adopted by the governing body
of a state agency or a city, town or county;
(vii) "Sanctuary city, town or county" or
"sanctuary state" means a jurisdiction that limits or
refuses to communicate or cooperate with federal officials
or law enforcement officers regarding the reporting of
immigration status information.
9-25-102. Prohibition on immigration sanctuary
policies and designations; penalty.
(a) No governing body of a state agency or a city,
town or county, whether acting through its governing body
or by an initiative, referendum or other process, shall:
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0133
ENROLLED ACT NO. 76, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(i) Enact, adopt, implement or enforce any
policy that prohibits or restricts state or local officials
or employees from communicating or cooperating with federal
officials or law enforcement officers with regard to
reporting immigration status information while the state or
local official or employee is acting within the scope of
the official's or employee's official duties;
(ii) Declare or designate the state or city,
town or county as a sanctuary state or sanctuary city, town
or county.
(b) No state or local official or employee shall be
prohibited or restricted from communicating or cooperating
with federal officials or law enforcement officers with
regard to reporting immigration status information while
the official or state employee is acting within the scope
of the official's or employee's official duties.
(c) No executive order shall declare or designate the
state of Wyoming as a sanctuary state.
(d) Any person lawfully residing and domiciled in
this state shall have a private right of action to file for
a writ of mandamus to compel any noncooperating state or
local official or employee to comply with this chapter.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0133
ENROLLED ACT NO. 76, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4